src/fst/affixes/verbs.lexc
    !       3SgF        keentaa         keentay         keénaysaa           keénaysay
    !       1Pl         keennaa         keennay         keénaynaa           keénaynay
    !       2Pl         keentaan        keenteen        keénaysaan          keénayseen
    !       3Pl         keen0aan        keen0een        keénay0aan          keénay0een

    !  #### Relative - Head+Sem/Obj/Clause+Sem/Obj
    !
    !       1Sg         keen0ó          keen0aý         keénay0ó            keénay0aý
    !       2Sg         keentó          keentaý         keénaysó            keénaysaý
    !       3SgM        keen0ó          keen0aý         keénay0ó            keénay0aý
    !       3SgF        keentó          keentaý         keénaysó            keénaysaý
    !       1Pl         keennó          keennaý         keénaynó            keénaynaý
    !       2Pl         keentáan        keentéen        keénaysáan          keénayséen
    !       3Pl         keen0áan        keen0éen        keénay0áan          keénay0éen

    !  #### Reduced+Nom - Head+Subj/Clause+Subj
    !
    !       1Sg         keen0aa         keen0ay         keénay0aa           keénay0ay
    !       2Sg         keen0aa         keen0ay         keénay0aa           keénay0ay
    !       3SgM        keen0aa         keen0ay         keénay0aa           keénay0ay
    !       3SgF        keentaa         keentay         keénaysaa           keénaysay
    !       1Pl         keennaa         keennay         keénaynaa           keénaynay
    !       2Pl         keen0aa         keen0ay         keénay0aa           keénay0ay
    !       3Pl         keen0aa         keen0ay         keénay0aa           keénay0ay

    !  #### Reduced+Abs - Head+Subj/Clause+Sem/Obj
    !
    !       1Sg         keen0á          keen0aý         keénayá             keénayaý
    !       2Sg         keen0á          keen0aý         keénayá             keénayaý
    !       3SgM        keen0á          keen0aý         keénayá             keénayaý
    !       3SgF        keentá          keentaý         keénaysá            keénaysaý
    !       1Pl         keenná          keennaý         keénayná            keénaynaý
    !       2Pl         keen0á          keen0aý         keénayá             keénayaý
    !       3Pl         keen0á          keen0aý         keénayá             keénayaý

    !  #### Negative
    !
    !       1Sg         keen0ó          keenín          keénay0ó            keénaýn
    !       2Sg         keentó          keenín          keénaysó            keénaýn
    !       3SgM        keen0ó          keenín          keénay0ó            keénaýn
    !       3SgF        keentó          keenín          keénaysó            keénaýn
    !       1Pl         keennó          keenín          keénaynó            keénaynín
    !       2Pl         keentáan        keenín          keénaysáan          keénaynín
    !       3Pl         keen0áan        keenín          keénay0áan          keénaynín

    !  #### Optative (Almost like negative, but tone difference)
    !
    !       1Sg         keén0o
    !       2Sg         keénto/keéntid
    !       3SgM        keen0o
    !       3SgF        keento
    !       1Pl         keénno
    !       2Pl         keénteen
    !       3Pl         keen0een

    !  ### Negative optative
    !
    !       1Sg         yáanan
    !       2Sg         yáanad
    !       3SgM        yáanu
    !       3SgF        yáanay
    !       1Pl         yáynu
    !                   yáanan/yáananu
    !       2Pl         yáanad
    !       3Pl         yáanay
    !
    !       + keénin / karín / sameýn / joogsán / furán
    !

    ! -------

    ! Tone marking
    !
    !  With the exception of progressive, verbs generally carry one tone. The
    !  progressive exception is possibly clarified with that it is a fusion
    !  of a verb stem with the copula `ah`.
    !
    !  Boundary tones are sometimes applied, as in the case of subordinate verbs.

!
! ! Conditional
!
!
! ! Conditional Neg
!
!
! ! Potential
!
!

! TODO: Subordinate clause forms - mostly done?
! TODO: V->N derivations, -id, etc

LEXICON V1_VerbMorf
    @P.VCLASS.V1@    V1_ ;

    ! Derived forms here so flag diacritic is applied only once.
    ! These verbs can be derived into V3B and adjectives

    ! difference of 40067 uncovered to 39340 uncovered
    ! Maybe use these to discover things that should be their own lemma
    +Der/V:a       V3B_VerbMorf ;
    +Der/N:a       V3B_VerbMorf ;

    ! dhig -> dhignaan, dhan -> dhammaan (dham%>naan -> dham%>maan)
    ! Derive and then just treat it as a noun stem
    +Der/V:%>naan    NOUN1_F/SgOnly ;

    LEXICON V1_
    +V:              V1_VerbMorf_Tones ;

LEXICON V1_IV_VerbMorf
    @P.VCLASS.V1@   V1_IV ;

    +Der/V:a       V3B_VerbMorf ;
    +Der/V:%^an   AdjState ;

    LEXICON V1_IV
    +V+IV:          V1_VerbMorf_Tones ;

LEXICON V1_TV_VerbMorf
    @P.VCLASS.V1@   V1_TV ;

    LEXICON V1_TV
    +V+TV:          V1_VerbMorf_Tones ;


LEXICON V1_VerbMorf_VDel
    @P.VCLASS.V1@   V1_VDel_ ;
    
    LEXICON V1_VDel_
    +V:             V1_VerbMorf_VDel_Tones ;

LEXICON V1_VerbMorf_IV_VDel
    @P.VCLASS.V1@   V1_IV_VDel_ ;
    
    LEXICON V1_IV_VDel_
    +V+IV:          V1_VerbMorf_VDel_Tones ;

LEXICON V1_VerbMorf_TV_VDel
    @P.VCLASS.V1@   V1_TV_VDel_ ;
    
    LEXICON V1_TV_VDel_
    +V+TV:          V1_VerbMorf_VDel_Tones ;


LEXICON V1_VerbMorf_ow_oob
    @P.VCLASS.V1ow@ V1_VerbMorf_ow_oob_Tones ;

LEXICON V1_VerbMorf_ow_ob
    @P.VCLASS.V1ow2@ V1_VerbMorf_ow_oob_Tones ;

! magacow, and a few others; mostly like 
! ow_ob, and in lexicon magac is the stem
! but, infinitive is -bi
LEXICON MAGACOW_IV_TV
    @P.VCLASS.V1ow2@ MAGACOW_PB ;

    LEXICON MAGACOW_PB
        +V+TV:      MAGACOW_Tones ;
        +V+IV:      MAGACOW_Tones ;

LEXICON MUUSAW_IV
    @P.VCLASS.V1ow2@ MUUSAW_PB ;

    LEXICON MUUSAW_PB
        +V+IV:      MUUSAW_Tones ;

LEXICON V2A_VerbMorf
    @P.VCLASS.V2A@  V2A_ ;

    ! Derived forms here so flag diacritic is applied only once.
    +Der/V:{-I}sa       V3A_VerbMorf ;
    +Der/V:{-I}san      AdjState ;


    LEXICON V2A_
    +V:             V2A_VerbMorf_Tones ;

LEXICON V2A_IV_VerbMorf
    @P.VCLASS.V2A@  V2A_IV ;

    +Der/V:{-I}sa       V3A_VerbMorf ;
    +Der/V:{-I}san      AdjState ;

    LEXICON V2A_IV
    +V+IV:          V2A_VerbMorf_Tones ;

LEXICON V2A_DV_VerbMorf
    @P.VCLASS.V2A@  V2A_DV ;

    +Der/V:{-I}sa       V3A_VerbMorf ;
    +Der/V:{-I}san      AdjState ;

    LEXICON V2A_DV
    +V+DV:          V2A_VerbMorf_Tones ;


LEXICON V2A_TV_VerbMorf
    @P.VCLASS.V2A@  V2A_TV ;

    +Der/V:{-I}sa       V3A_VerbMorf ;
    +Der/V:{-I}san      AdjState ;

    LEXICON V2A_TV
    +V+TV:          V2A_VerbMorf_Tones ;

LEXICON V2A_VerbMorf/SII
    @P.VCLASS.V2A@  V2A_VerbMorf_Tones/SII ;

LEXICON V2B_VerbMorf
    @P.VCLASS.V2B@  V2B_ ;

    LEXICON V2B_
     +V:            V2B_VerbMorf_Tones ;

LEXICON V2B_IV_VerbMorf
    @P.VCLASS.V2B@  V2B_IV ;

    LEXICON V2B_IV
     +V+IV:         V2B_VerbMorf_Tones ;

LEXICON V2B_TV_VerbMorf
    @P.VCLASS.V2B@  V2B_TV ;

    LEXICON V2B_TV
     +V+TV:         V2B_VerbMorf_Tones ;

LEXICON V3A_VerbMorf
    @P.VCLASS.V3A@  V3A_ ;

    LEXICON V3A_
        +V:         V3A_VerbMorf_Tones ;

LEXICON V3A_IV_VerbMorf
    @P.VCLASS.V3A@  V3A_IV ;

    LEXICON V3A_IV
        +V+IV:      V3A_VerbMorf_Tones ;

LEXICON V3A_TV_VerbMorf
    @P.VCLASS.V3A@  V3A_TV ;

    LEXICON V3A_TV
        +V+TV:      V3A_VerbMorf_Tones ;

LEXICON V3B_VerbMorf
    @P.VCLASS.V3B@  V3B_ ;

    LEXICON V3B_
        +V:         V3B_VerbMorf_Tones ;

! TODO: move +V, etc
LEXICON V3B_IV_VerbMorf
    @P.VCLASS.V3B@  V3B_IV ;

    LEXICON V3B_IV
        +V+IV:      V3B_VerbMorf_Tones ;

LEXICON V3B_IV_OW_VerbMorf
    @P.VCLASS.V3B@  V3B_OW_IV ;

    LEXICON V3B_OW_IV
        +V+IV:      V3B_VerbMorf_OW_Tones ;

LEXICON V3B_IV_O_VerbMorf
    @P.VCLASS.V3B@  V3B_O_IV ;

    LEXICON V3B_O_IV
        +V+IV:      V3B_VerbMorf_O_Tones ;

LEXICON V3B_IV_ADel_VerbMorf
    @P.VCLASS.V3B@  V3B_ADel_IV ;
