src/fst/stems/verbs.lexc
LEXICON V1
abtiyow:abtiyo V1_VerbMorf_ow_ob ;
ballaq V1_TV_VerbMorf ;
basaas V1_IV_VerbMorf ;
cab V1_VerbMorf ;
caddiban V1_VerbMorf_VDel ;
calaf V1_VerbMorf_TV_VDel ;
ciddillaab V1_IV_VerbMorf ;
cidlow:cidlo V1_VerbMorf_ow_oob ;
dacay V1_TV_VerbMorf ;
danaq V1_VerbMorf_TV_VDel ;
dhac V1_TV_VerbMorf ;
dhafar V1_VerbMorf_VDel ;
dhaliil V1_VerbMorf ;
dhaqaaladdarrow:dhaqaaladdarro V1_VerbMorf_ow_oob ;
dhurow:dhuro V1_VerbMorf_ow_oob ;
dul-orod V1_VerbMorf_TV_VDel ;
duudduuban V1_VerbMorf_VDel ;
faar V1_IV_VerbMorf ;
fallaagow:fallaago V1_VerbMorf_ow_oob ;
fatah V1_TV_VerbMorf ;
fennid V1_VerbMorf ;
godol V1_VerbMorf_TV_VDel ;
hadar V1_VerbMorf_VDel ;
hindhis V1_IV_VerbMorf ;
hoosjoog V1_VerbMorf ;
jir V1_TV_VerbMorf ;
kadeedan V1_VerbMorf_VDel ;
karah V1_VerbMorf_TV_VDel ;
kiil V1_VerbMorf ;
laalacshow:laalacsho V1_VerbMorf_ow_oob ;
madmad V1_IV_VerbMorf ;
magacow:magac MAGACOW_IV_TV ;
maraq V1_VerbMorf_TV_VDel ;
mayran V1_VerbMorf_VDel ;
mud:m¨ud V1_VerbMorf ;
muusaw:muus MUUSAW_IV ;
qabyow:qabyo V1_VerbMorf_ow_oob ;
qawl V1_TV_VerbMorf ;
qolaysan V1_VerbMorf_VDel ;
qoroqorow:qoroqoro V1_VerbMorf_ow_ob ;
sarac V1_VerbMorf_TV_VDel ;
sarakac V1_IV_VerbMorf ;
taf V1_VerbMorf ;
waabaayow:waabaayo V1_VerbMorf_ow_oob ;
waddac V1_TV_VerbMorf ;
yawyab V1_IV_VerbMorf ;
LEXICON V2A
bi'i V2A_VerbMorf ;
boji V2A_IV_VerbMorf ;
bushi V2A_TV_VerbMorf ;
daali V2A_VerbMorf ;
dabsii V2A_DV_VerbMorf ;
danaani V2A_IV_VerbMorf ;
dhacsii V2A_DV_VerbMorf ;
dhaji V2A_TV_VerbMorf ;
doobbi V2A_IV_VerbMorf ;
faali V2A_VerbMorf ;
firikhi V2A_TV_VerbMorf ;
gaarsii V2A_DV_VerbMorf ;
gacanhaadi V2A_IV_VerbMorf ;
halmaansii V2A_DV_VerbMorf ;
harraadi V2A_TV_VerbMorf ;
iscidhiidhi V2A_VerbMorf ;
ismoodsii V2A_IV_VerbMorf ;
meehaali V2A_TV_VerbMorf ;
nacsii V2A_DV_VerbMorf ;
ogeysii V2A_VerbMorf ;
qalinjebi V2A_IV_VerbMorf ;
rudsii V2A_DV_VerbMorf ;
tadhihi V2A_TV_VerbMorf ;
tali V2A_VerbMorf ;
wari V2A_IV_VerbMorf ;
LEXICON V2B
buhabbuhee V2B_TV_VerbMorf ;
caree:car V2B_VerbMorf ;
cawadhaxmee:cawadhaxm V2B_IV_VerbMorf ;
codee:cod V2B_VerbMorf ;
dabammaryee V2B_TV_VerbMorf ;
dhexee:dhex V2B_VerbMorf ;
diglee:digl V2B_IV_VerbMorf ;
garmaamee:garmaam V2B_IV_VerbMorf ;
gee:g V2B_VerbMorf ;
goobee V2B_TV_VerbMorf ;
ilkacaddee:ilkacadd V2B_IV_VerbMorf ;
laqbee V2B_TV_VerbMorf ;
nabadgelyee:nabadgely V2B_VerbMorf ;
nuxnuxlee:nuxnuxl V2B_IV_VerbMorf ;
rajee V2B_TV_VerbMorf ;
samee:samay V2B_VerbMorf ;
wareegacaddee:wareegacadd V2B_IV_VerbMorf ;
wiliqdhabee V2B_TV_VerbMorf ;
LEXICON V3A
cayuumayso:cayuumaysa V3A_TV_VerbMorf ;
ciirayso:ciiraysa V3A_IV_VerbMorf ;
darso:darsa V3A_VerbMorf ;
dhilliso:dhillisa V3A_TV_VerbMorf ;
fanqooqso:fanqooqsa V3A_IV_VerbMorf ;
fudayso:fudaysa V3A_VerbMorf ;
giijiso:giijisa V3A_TV_VerbMorf ;
hoogaanso:hoogaansa V3A_IV_VerbMorf ;
hubso:hubsa V3A_VerbMorf ;
kireyso:kireysa V3A_TV_VerbMorf ;
lixeyso:lixeysa V3A_IV_VerbMorf ;
marso:marsa V3A_VerbMorf ;
qiro:qira V3A_TV_VerbMorf ;
qowleyso:qowleysa V3A_IV_VerbMorf ;
ramayso:ramaysa V3A_VerbMorf ;
toogo:tooga V3A_TV_VerbMorf ;
wahso:wahsa V3A_IV_VerbMorf ;
weyddiiso:weyddiisa V3A_VerbMorf ;
LEXICON V3B
barood:baroo V3B_VerbMorf ;
barooro:baroor V3B_IV_ADel_VerbMorf ;
basarxumow:basarxum V3B_IV_OW_VerbMorf ;
bukood:bukoo V3B_VerbMorf ;
ciiqo:ciiq V3B_IV_ADel_VerbMorf ;
cunaggubyoo V3B_IV_VerbMorf ;
cusbow:cusb V3B_IV_OW_VerbMorf ;
dabaysho V3B_IV_O_VerbMorf ;
dhuubnow:dhuubn V3B_IV_OW_VerbMorf ;
diho:dih V3B_IV_ADel_VerbMorf ;
diqoo V3B_IV_VerbMorf ;
faasho V3B_IV_O_VerbMorf ;
fadhiiso:fadhiisa V3B_VerbMorf ;
guuntoo V3B_IV_VerbMorf ;
halaaqood:halaaqoo V3B_VerbMorf ;
igdho V3B_IV_O_VerbMorf ;
jalbeebo:jalbeeb V3B_IV_ADel_VerbMorf ;
kardho V3B_IV_O_VerbMorf ;
kontoroolo:kontoroola V3B_IV_VerbMorf ;
madalsanow:madalsan V3B_IV_OW_VerbMorf ;
manuunso V3B_IV_O_VerbMorf ;
mideysnow:mideysn V3B_IV_OW_VerbMorf ;
noqo:noqo V3B_VerbMorf ;
orgoo V3B_IV_VerbMorf ;
qalbifurnow:qalbifurn V3B_IV_OW_VerbMorf ;
qallooco:qallooc V3B_IV_ADel_VerbMorf ;
seexseexo:seexseexa V3B_VerbMorf ;
siqo:siq V3B_IV_ADel_VerbMorf ;
sulmoo V3B_IV_VerbMorf ;
tasho V3B_IV_O_VerbMorf ;
